Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Nuclear Energy

152.105.
Declaration of policy. [Repealed.]

152.110.
Definitions for KRS 152.105 to 152.190. [Repealed.]

152.115.
Governor’s power to make agreements with federal agencies. [Repealed.]

152.120.
Participating agencies — Studies and regulations. [Repealed.]

152.125.
Licenses to handle radioactive material. [Repealed.]

152.130.
Rules and regulations to be approved by the Governor — Delegation. [Repealed.]

152.140.
Kentucky science and technology advisory council — Members — Qualifications — Officers — Compensation. [Repealed.]

152.150.
Functions of council. [Repealed.]

152.160.
Division of nuclear information. [Repealed.]

152.170.
General regulations. [Repealed.]

152.180.
Federal licenses or permits. [Repealed.]

152.190.
Penalties and injunctions. [Repealed.]